Utah statutes.
20A-5-409 (Superseded 01/01/12).   Certification of candidates to county clerks.

No later than September 8 of each regular general election year, the lieutenant governor shall certify to each county clerk the name of each candidate qualified to be printed on the regular general election ballot for that county clerk’s county.

